North Carolina statutes. Chapter 113. Conservation and Development.
Article 21. Licenses and Permits Issued by the Wildlife Resources Commission.
§ 113-274.
Permits.

As used in this Article, the word “permit” refers to a written authorization issued by an employee or agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission to an individual to conduct some activity over which the Wildlife Resources Commission has jurisdiction. Unless otherwise specified, permits are issued at no cost. When a more limited duration period is not set by the Executive Director, permits are valid through December 31 in any calendar year. When sale of wildlife resources is permitted, rules or the directives of the Executive Director may require the retention of invoices or copies of invoices in lieu of a permit.

Except as otherwise specifically provided, no one may engage in any activity for which a permit is required without having first procured a current and valid permit.

The Wildlife Resources Commission may issue the following permits:

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

(1a)

Depredation Permit. —

Authorizes the taking, destruction, transfer, removal, transplanting, or driving away of undesirable, harmful, predatory, excess, or surplus wildlife or wildlife resources. Livestock or poultry owners shall be issued a depredation permit for coyotes upon request. The permit must state the manner of taking and the disposition of wildlife or wildlife resources authorized or required and the time for which the permit is valid, plus other restrictions that may be administratively imposed in accordance with rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. No depredation permit or any license is needed for the owner or lessee of property to take wildlife while committing depredations upon the property. The Wildlife Resources Commission may regulate the manner of taking and the disposition of wildlife taken without permit or license, including wildlife killed accidentally by motor vehicle or in any other manner.

(1b)

Captivity Permit. —

Authorizes the possession of live wildlife that may lawfully be permitted to be retained alive, in accordance with governing rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission. This permit may not substitute for any required collection license or captivity license, but may be temporarily issued for possession of wild animals or wild birds for scientific, educational, exhibition, or other purposes pending action on a captivity license or following its denial or termination. If this permit is issued for fish to be held indefinitely, the Wildlife Resources Commission may provide for periodic renewals of the permit, at least once each three years, to insure a review of the circumstances and conditions under which fish are kept. Wild animals and wild birds kept temporarily in captivity under this permit must be humanely treated and in accordance with any stipulations in the permit, but the standards of caging and care applicable to species kept under the captivity license do not apply unless specified in the permit. Any substantial deviation from reasonable requirements imposed by rule or administratively under the authority of this section renders the possession of the wildlife unlawful.

(1c)

Possession Permit —

($10.00). Authorizes the possession of dead wildlife or other wildlife resources lawfully acquired. The Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule implement the issuance and supervision of this permit, in accordance with governing laws and rules respecting the possession of wildlife. Any substantial deviation from reasonable requirements imposed by rule or administratively under the authority of this section renders the possession of the wildlife unlawful.

Transportation Permit. — The Wildlife Resources Commission may require the use of transportation permits by persons required to be licensed under this Article, or by persons and individuals exempt from license requirements, while transporting wildlife resources within the State — as necessary to discourage unlawful taking or dealing in wildlife resources and to control and promote the orderly and systematic transportation of wildlife resources within, into, through, and out of the State. Transportation permits may be issued for wildlife transported either dead or alive, in accordance with restrictions that may be reasonably imposed. When convenient, rules or administrative directives may require the retention and use of an invoice or memorandum of sale, or the license or permit authorizing the taking or acquisition of the wildlife resources, as a transportation permit. When circumstances warrant, however, a separate additional transportation permit may be required. Any substantial deviation from reasonable requirements imposed by rule or administratively under the authority of this section renders the transportation of the wildlife resources unlawful.

Exportation or Importation Permit — ($10.00). Authorizes the exportation or importation of wildlife resources from or into the State or from county to county. The Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule implement the issuance and supervision of this permit, in accordance with governing laws and rules respecting the exportation and importation of wildlife resources. Any substantial deviation from reasonable requirements imposed by rule or administratively under the authority of this section renders the importation or exportation of the wildlife resources unlawful.

(3a)

Trophy Wildlife Sale Permit —

($10.00). Authorizes the owner of lawfully taken and possessed dead wildlife specimens or their parts that are mounted, stuffed, or otherwise permanently preserved to sell identified individual specimens that may lawfully be sold under applicable laws and rules.

(3b)

Repealed by Session Laws 1993, c. 18, s. 4.

(3c)

Hunting Heritage Apprentice Permit. —

Authorizes a person who does not meet the hunter education course requirements under

G.S. 113-270.1

A(a) to purchase a hunting license and hunt if accompanied by an adult at least 18 years of age who is licensed to hunt in this State or if accompanied by an adult landholder or spouse exempted from the hunting license requirement as defined by G.S. 113-276(c), provided the licensee is hunting on the landholder’s land. For purposes of this section, “accompanied” means that the licensed adult maintains a proximity that enables the adult to monitor the activities of the apprentice by remaining within sight and hearing distance at all times without use of electronic devices. This permit is valid only for the term of the hunting license purchased under the authority of the permit. Any person who hunts with a permit issued under this subdivision without complying with all the requirements of this subdivision is guilty of hunting without having first procured a current and valid license, in violation of

G.S. 113-270.1

B.

(3d)

Endangered Species Permit —

($10.00). Authorizes the collection, possession, or survey of endangered species. The Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule set standards and requirements for this permit. The Wildlife Resources Commission may enact rules utilizing replacement costs of wildlife resources to offset the impact of collection, possession, or survey activities.

(3e)

Field Trial Permit —

($10.00). Authorizes an individual to hold a Commission-sanctioned field trial for dogs in accordance with governing laws and rules adopted and implemented by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Other Permits. — In implementing the provisions of this Subchapter, the Wildlife Resources Commission may issue permits for taking, purchase, or sale of wildlife resources if the activity is lawfully authorized, if there is a need for control of the activity, and no other license or permit is applicable. In addition, if a specific statute so provides, a permit under this subdivision may be required in addition to a license when there is a need for closer control than provided by the license.

History.

1935, c. 486, ss. 4, 22; 1941, c. 231, s. 1; 1965, c. 957, s. 2; 1971, c. 423, s. 2; c. 809, s. 1; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1977, c. 794, s. 1; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 1993, c. 18, s. 4; 2010-156, s. 2; 2013-3, s. 2; 2013-63, s. 3; 2019-204, s. 6(m).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2010-156, s. 2, effective July 22, 2010, added the second sentence in subsection (1a).

Session Laws 2013-3, s. 2, effective March 6, 2013, added “for scientific, educational, exhibition, or other purposes” following “wild animals or wild birds” in the second sentence of subdivision (c)(1b).

Session Laws 2013-63, s. 3, effective July 1, 2013, added subdivision (c)(3c).

Session Laws 2019-204, s. 6(m), effective September 1, 2019, substituted “Permit — ($10.00)” for “Permit” throughout subsection (c); in subsection (a), deleted “without charge” following “issued”, and “or a person” following “an individual” in the first sentence and added the second and third sentences; and added subdivisions (c)(3d) and (c)(3e).

§ 113-275.
General provisions respecting licenses and permits.

The Wildlife Resources Commission is authorized to make agreements with other jurisdictions as to reciprocal honoring of licenses in the best interests of the conservation of wildlife resources.

(a1)

Notwithstanding the fees specified for nonresident individuals by

G.S. 113-270.2

, 113-270.3, 113-270.4, 113-270.5, 113-271, 113-272.2, 113-273, or Wildlife Resources Commission rules, if the Wildlife Resources Commission finds that a state has a nonresident license fee related to wildlife resources that exceeds the fee for a comparable nonresident license in North Carolina, the Wildlife Resources Commission may, by resolution in official session, increase the nonresident license fee applicable to citizens of that state to an amount equal to the fee a North Carolina resident is required to pay in that state.The action of the Wildlife Resources Commission to increase a fee pursuant to this subsection is not subject to the provisions of Article 2A of Chapter 150B of the General Statutes. The action of the Wildlife Resources Commission to increase a fee pursuant to this subsection becomes effective on the date specified by the Wildlife Resources Commission.

Every license issued under the provisions of this Article is effective beginning upon its date of issuance unless the license expressly provides to the contrary, in accordance with rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission and such administrative authority to set future effective dates in particular types of cases as may be delegated by the Wildlife Resources Commission to responsible employees or agents.

(b1)

No hunting or fishing license issued to a resident under the provisions of

G.S. 113-270.1

C, 113-270.1D, 113-270.2, 113-270.3, 113-271, or 113-272 becomes invalid for use during the term for which it is issued by reason of a removal of the residence of the licensee to another state.

Every license issued under the provisions of this Article must be sold for the full prescribed amount notwithstanding that a portion of the prescribed license period may have elapsed prior to the license application.

(c1)

Upon receipt of a proper application together with a fee of five dollars ($5.00), the Wildlife Resources Commission may issue a new license or permit to replace one that has been lost or destroyed before its expiration. The application must be on a form of the Wildlife Resources Commission setting forth information in sufficient detail to allow ready identification of the lost or destroyed license or permit and ascertainment of the applicant’s continued entitlement to it.

In implementing the sale and distribution of licenses issued under this Article, the Wildlife Resources Commission may require license applicants to disclose such information as necessary for determining the applicant’s eligibility for a particular license. Such information as deemed desirable to assist in enforcement of license requirements may be required to be recorded on the face of any license. Fixing the form of the license may be by reasonable administrative directive, and requirements as to such form need not be embodied in rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission in order to be validly required.

Where employees of the Wildlife Resources Commission sell licenses of a type also sold through license agents, such employees must sell the licenses for the full amount and remit such full amount to the Wildlife Resources Commission without any deduction of the stipulated license agent’s fee.

Except as otherwise specifically provided by statute or except as the Wildlife Resources Commission may by rule prescribe to the contrary:

All licenses and permits under this Article must be kept ready at hand by or about the person of individual licensees and permittees while engaged in the regulated operations;

All licenses and permits under this Article are nontransferable; and

All individuals engaged in operations subject to license or permit requirements must have an individual license or permit — except where such individuals are in the employ of and under the supervision of someone who has the license or permit or acceptable evidence of the same at hand and the activity is one for which a person not an individual may acquire a license.

It is unlawful to buy, sell, lend, borrow, or in any other way transfer or receive or attempt to do any such things with respect to any nontransferable license or permit for the purpose of circumventing the requirements of this Article.

It is unlawful for any person engaged in regulated operations under this Article to refuse to exhibit or display any required license, permit, or identification upon the request of any employee or agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission or of any officer authorized to enforce the provisions of this Article.

It is unlawful to refuse to comply with any provisions of this Article or of rules and administrative requirements reasonably promulgated under the authority of this Article.

It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for any person:

Knowingly to engage in any activity regulated under this Article with an improper, false, or altered license or permit;

Knowingly to make any application for a license or permit to which he is not entitled;

Knowingly to make any false, fraudulent, or misleading statement in applying for a license or permit under this Article; or

To counterfeit, alter, or falsify any application, license, or permit under this Article.

A person may use a bow and arrow to take nongame fish in inland and joint fishing waters subject to any applicable rule of the Wildlife Resources Commission regarding seasons, creel limits, type of weapon or subsidiary gear, or any other restriction necessary for the conservation of wildlife under the authority of the following licenses:

All of the combination hunting and fishing licenses issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-270.1

C;

All of the sportsman licenses issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-270.1

D;

The hunting licenses issued pursuant to G.S. 113- 270.2(c)(1), (2), (3), (5), and (6);

The hook-and-line fishing licenses issued pursuant to G.S. 113-271(d)(2), (3), (4), (5), (6), (8), and (9); and

All of the special device fishing licenses issued pursuant to

G.S. 113-272.2

.

History.

1929, c. 335, ss. 6, 10, 11; 1945, c. 567, ss. 5, 6; 1961, c. 329; 1965, c. 957, s. 2; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1981, c. 620, ss. 7, 8; 1987, c. 745, s. 1; c. 827, s. 98; 1993, c. 539, s. 855; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, s. 7; 1995, c. 36, s. 1; 2000-189, s. 10; 2005-455, s. 1.10; 2019-204, s. 6(n).

§ 113-276.
Exemptions and exceptions to license and permit requirements.

, (b) Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

(c)

Except as otherwise provided in this Subchapter, every landholder, landholder’s spouse, and dependents under 18 years of age residing with the landholder may take wildlife upon the land held by the landholder without any license required by

G.S. 113-270.1

B or

G.S. 113-270.3

(a), except that these persons are not exempt from the American alligator licenses established in

G.S. 113-270.3

(b)(6) and G.S. 113-270.3(b)(7), elk licenses established in G.S. 113-270.3(b)(8) and G.S. 113-270.3(b)(9), bear management stamp established in G.S. 113-270.3(b)(1b), and the falconry license described in G.S. 113-270.3(b)(4).

(d)

Except as otherwise provided in this Subchapter, individuals under 16 years of age are exempt from the hunting and trapping license requirements of

G.S. 113-270.1

B(a) and G.S. 113-270.3, except that these individuals are not exempt from the American alligator licenses established in G.S. 113-270.3(b)(6) and G.S. 113-270.3(b)(7), elk licenses established in G.S. 113-270.3(b)(8) and G.S. 113-270.3(b)(9), and the falconry license described in G.S. 113-270.3(b)(4). Individuals under 16 years of age may hunt under this exemption, so long as the hunter is accompanied by an adult of at least 18 years of age who is licensed to hunt in this State. For purposes of this section, “accompanied” means that the licensed adult maintains a proximity that enables the adult to monitor the activities of the hunter by remaining within sight and hearing distance at all times without use of electronic devices. Upon successfully obtaining the hunter education certificate of competency required by G.S. 113-270.1A(a), a hunter may hunt under the license exemption until age 16 without adult accompaniment. Individuals under 16 years of age are exempt from the fishing license requirements of G.S. 113.270.1B(a) and

G.S. 113-271

.

(e)

Repealed by Session Laws 2005-455, s. 1.11.

(f)

A special device license is not required when a landing net is used in any of the following applications:

To take nongame fish in inland fishing waters.

To assist in taking fish in inland fishing waters when the initial and primary method of taking is by the use of hook and line — so long as applicable hook-and-line fishing-license requirements are met.

As used in this subsection, a “landing net” is a net with a handle not exceeding eight feet in length and with a hoop or frame to which the net is attached not exceeding 60 inches along its outer perimeter.

(g)

Bow nets covered by a special device license may be used in waters and during the seasons authorized in the rules of the Wildlife Resources Commission by an individual other than the licensee with the permission of the licensee. The individual using another’s bow net must also secure the net owner’s special device license and keep it on or about the individual’s person while fishing in inland fishing waters.

(h)

Repealed by Session Laws 1979, c. 830, s. 1.

(i)

A food server may prepare edible wildlife lawfully taken and possessed by a patron for serving to the patron and any guest the patron may have. The Executive Director may provide for the keeping of records by the food server necessary for administrative control and supervision with respect to wildlife brought in by patrons.

(j)

A migrant farm worker who has in his possession a temporary certification of his status as such by the Rural Employment Service of the Division of Employment Security on a form provided by the Wildlife Resources Commission is entitled to the privileges of a resident of the State and of the county indicated on such certification during the term thereof for the purposes of purchasing and using the resident fishing licenses provided by

G.S. 113-271

(d)(2), (4), and (6)a.

(k)

Box-trapped rabbits may be released for the purpose of training dogs on an area of private land that is completely enclosed with a metal fence through which rabbits may not escape or enter at any time. The Wildlife Resources Commission may establish rules to set standards for areas on which rabbits are released. A person may participate in a field trial for beagles without a hunting license if approved in advance by the Executive Director, conducted without the use or possession of firearms, and on an area of not more than 100 acres of private land that is completely and permanently enclosed with a metal fence through which rabbits may not escape or enter at any time.

(
l
)

The fishing license provisions of this Article do not apply upon the lands held in trust by the United States for the Eastern Band of the Cherokee Indians.

(
l
1)

The licensing provisions of this Article do not apply to a member of an Indian tribe recognized under Chapter 71A of the General Statutes for purposes of hunting, trapping, or fishing on tribal land. A person taking advantage of this exemption shall possess and produce proper identification confirming the person’s membership in a State-recognized tribe upon request by a wildlife enforcement officer. For purposes of this section, “tribal land” means only real property owned by an Indian tribe recognized under Chapter 71A of the General Statutes.

(
l
2)

A resident of this State who is a member of the Armed Forces of the United States serving outside the State, or who is serving on full-time active military duty outside the State in a reserve component of the Armed Forces of the United States as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 10101, is exempt from the hunting and fishing license requirements of G.S. 113-270.1B, G.S. 113-270.3(b)(1), G.S. 113-270.3(b)(3), G.S. 113-270.3(b)(5), G.S. 113-271, and the Coastal Recreational Fishing License requirements of

G.S. 113-174.2

while that person is on leave in this State for 30 days or less. In order to qualify for the exemption provided under this subsection, the person shall have on his or her person at all times during the hunting or fishing activity the person’s military identification card and a copy of the official document issued by the person’s service unit confirming that the person is on authorized leave from a duty station outside this State.A person exempted from licensing requirements under this subsection is responsible for complying with any reporting requirements prescribed by rule of the Wildlife Resources Commission, complying with the hunter education requirements of G.S. 113-270.1A, purchasing any federal migratory waterfowl stamps as a result of waterfowl hunting activity, and complying with any other requirements that apply to the holder of a North Carolina license.

(
l
3) A resident or nonresident of this State who served as a member of the Armed Forces and who separated under honorable conditions is exempt from the Mountain Heritage Trout fishing license requirements of G.S. 113-271(d)(10) while fishing in waters designated by the Wildlife Resources Commission as Mountain Heritage Trout waters. In order to qualify for the exemption provided under this subsection, the person shall have valid documentation of their service on his or her person at all times during the fishing activity.

(m)

The fourth day of July of each year is declared a free fishing day to promote the sport of fishing and no hook-and-line fishing license is required to fish in any of the public waters of the State on that day. All other laws and rules pertaining to hook-and-line fishing apply.

(n)

The Wildlife Resources Commission may adopt rules to exempt individuals from the hunting and fishing license requirements of G.S. 113-270.1B, 113-270.3(b)(1), 113-270.3(b)(1a), 113-270.3(b)(1b), 113-270.3(b)(2), 113-270.3(b)(3), 113-270.3(b)(5), and 113-271 who participate in organized hunting and fishing events for the specified time and place of the event when the purpose of the event is consistent with the conservation objectives of the Commission. A person exempted from licensing requirements under this subsection is responsible for complying with any reporting requirements prescribed by rule of the Wildlife Resources Commission, purchasing any federal migratory waterfowl stamps as a result of waterfowl hunting activity, and complying with any other requirements that apply to the holder of a North Carolina license. Those exempted persons shall comply with the hunter safety requirements of G.S. 113-270.1A or shall be accompanied by a properly licensed adult who maintains a proximity to the exempt individual that enables the adult to monitor the activities of, and communicate with, the individual at all times.

(o)

An eligible member of a volunteer fire department, rescue squad, or emergency medical services squad for five consecutive fiscal years, including the prior fiscal year, may be issued any adult resident lifetime license issued and administered by the Wildlife Resources Commission for fifty percent (50%) of the applicable license fee amount. For purposes of this subsection, the term “eligible member” means (i) for volunteer fire department members, an individual appearing on the certified roster of eligible firefighters submitted to the North Carolina State Firefighters’ Association under

G.S. 58-86-25

and (ii) for volunteer rescue or emergency medical services squad members, an individual appearing on the certified roster of eligible rescue or emergency medical services squad members submitted to the North Carolina Association of Rescue and Emergency Medical Services, Inc., under

G.S. 58-86-30

.

History.

1929, c. 335, ss. 1, 10; 1935, c. 486, s. 12; 1937, c. 45, s. 1; 1945, c. 567, ss. 1, 6; c. 617; 1949, c. 1203, s. 1; 1951, c. 1112, s. 2; 1957, c. 849, s. 1; 1959, c. 304; 1961, cc. 312, 329; c. 834, s. 1; 1963, c. 170; 1965, c. 957, s. 2; 1967, cc. 127, 654, 790; 1969, c. 1030; c. 1042, ss. 1-5; 1971, c. 242; c. 282, s. 1; c. 705, ss. 1, 2; c. 1231, s. 1; 1973, c. 1262, s. 18; 1975, c. 197, ss. 1-4; 1977, c. 191, s. 1; c. 658; 1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 1993 (Reg. Sess., 1994), c. 684, ss. 6, 8, 9; 1999-456, ss. 29, 30; 2005-285, s. 1; 2005-438, s. 2; 2005-455, ss. 1.11, 1.12, 1.13, 1.14; 2009-25, s. 1; 2009-248, s. 1; 2011-401, s. 3.15; 2013-63, s. 4; 2013-283, s. 14; 2018-90, s. 3; 2019-204, ss. 6(o), 12; 2021-88, s. 10; 2021-160, ss. 5(a), 8A.

Local Modification.

Forsyth County: 2005-257, s. 1.

§ 113-276.1.
Regulatory authority of Wildlife Resources Commission as to license requirements and exemptions.

In its discretion and in accordance with the best interests of the conservation of wildlife resources, the Wildlife Resources Commission may implement the provisions of this Article with rules that:

[Reserved.]

Regulate license requirements and exemptions applying to the taking of wildlife on particular waters forming or lying across a county boundary where there may be confusion as to the location of the boundary, hardship imposed as to the location of the boundary, or difficulty of administering or enforcing the law with respect to the actual boundary location.

Require persons subject to license requirements, and persons exempt from license requirements, to carry, display, or produce identification that may be necessary to substantiate the person’s entitlement to a particular license or to a particular exemption from license requirements.

Require individuals aboard vessels or carrying weapons or other gear that may be used to take wildlife resources, and in an area at a time wildlife resources may be taken, to exhibit identification that includes the individual’s name and current address. More than one piece of identification, including a vehicle driver license, may be required to be exhibited, if available.

Implement a system of tagging and reporting fur-bearing animals and big game. Upon the implementation of a tagging system for any species of fur-bearing animal, the Wildlife Resources Commission may charge a reasonable fee to defray its costs for each tag furnished. The price of the big game hunting license includes the cost of big game tags.

History.

1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 2019-204, s. 6(p).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-204, s. 6(p), effective September 1, 2019, deleted “not to exceed two dollars twenty-five cents ($2.25) per tag” following “costs” in the second sentence in subdivision (5)

§ 113-276.2.
Licensees and permittees subject to administrative control; refusal to issue or reissue, suspension, and revocation of their licenses and permits; court orders of suspension.

This section applies to the administrative control of:

Persons, other than individual hunters and fishermen taking wildlife as sportsmen, holding permits under this Article;

Individuals holding special device licenses under G.S. 113-272.2(c)(1), (1a), (2), and (2a);

Individuals holding collection licenses under

G.S. 113-272.4

;

Individuals holding captivity licenses under

G.S. 113-272.5

and

G.S. 113-272.6

; and

Persons holding licenses under

G.S. 113-273

.

Before issuing any license or permit to persons subject to administrative control under this section, the Executive Director must satisfy himself that the person meets the qualifications set by statute, rule, or his administrative guidelines. If the person fails to meet the qualifications or if the Executive Director learns of some other cause for believing that issuing the license or permit would be contrary to the best interests of the conservation of wildlife resources, he must refuse to issue the license or permit.

Before reissuing any license or permit to any person subject to administrative control, the Executive Director must review all available information and apply the same standards that governed initial issuance of the license or permit before he may reissue it.

Upon refusing to issue or reissue a license or permit under this section, the Executive Director must notify the person in writing of the reasons for his action and inform him that if he is dissatisfied with the Executive Director’s decision he may commence a contested case on the refusal by filing a petition under

G.S. 150B-23

within 10 days of receiving the notice. The notice must be personally served by a law enforcement officer or an agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission or sent by mail with return receipt requested.

The Executive Director shall revoke a license or permit issued to a person subject to administrative control if he finds that the person does not meet the qualifications for the license or permit, has committed a substantial criminal violation of this Subchapter or a rule adopted under the Subchapter, or has seriously or persistently failed to comply with the terms and conditions upon which the license or permit was issued. Before revoking a license or permit, the Executive Director shall notify the licensee or permittee of his findings and his intention to revoke the license or permit. The notice must be personally served by a law enforcement officer or an agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission or sent by mail with return receipt requested. A licensee or permittee who disagrees with the Executive Director’s findings may commence a contested case on revocation by filing a petition under

G.S. 150B-23

within 10 days of receiving the notice. Revocation or suspension of a license or permit by a court under

G.S. 113-277

runs concurrently with a revocation under this section.

Repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 827, s. 8.

Upon revocation of a license or permit, the Executive Director or his agent must request return of the license or permit and all associated forms, tags, record books, inventories, invoice blanks, and other property furnished by the Wildlife Resources Commission or required to be kept by the Commission solely in connection with the license or permit. If the person needs to retain a copy of the property returned to the Wildlife Resources Commission for tax purposes or other lawful reason, the person may copy items returned if the copies are clearly marked in a manner that they could not be mistaken for the originals. In securing property to be returned or in otherwise closing out the affairs conducted under the license or permit, agents of the Wildlife Resources Commission may enter at reasonable hours the premises of the person in which wildlife resources or items of property pertaining to the license or permit are kept, or reasonably believed to be kept, to inspect, audit, inventory, remove, or take other appropriate action. Any wildlife resources in the possession of the person which he may no longer possess must be disposed of in accordance with the most nearly appropriate provision of

G.S. 113-137

. If a person fails to return to an agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission all wildlife resources and other property covered by this subsection; refuses to allow entry by the agent to inspect, audit, remove property, or perform other duties; or otherwise obstructs an agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission in performing his duties under this subsection, he is guilty of a Class 2 misdemeanor. Each day’s violation is a separate offense.

No person refused issuance or reissuance of a license or permit under this section, or whose license or permit was revoked, is eligible to apply again for that or any similar license or permit for two years. Upon application, the Executive Director may not grant the license or permit unless the person produces clear evidence, convincing to the Executive Director, that he meets all standards and qualifications and will comply with all requirements of statutes, rules, and reasonable administrative directives pertaining to the license or permit.

The Executive Director is required to make necessary investigations and cause necessary disclosure of information by all persons subject to administrative control, and all applicants for a license or permit that would place them in this category, to determine that the real party in interest is seeking or has been issued the license or permit. Any attempt to circumvent the provisions of this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

If the Executive Director determines that the effective conservation of wildlife resources would be seriously impaired by continued unfettered operations or by continued possession of property by the person subject to administrative control, the Executive Director may apply to the appropriate court for an order:

Placing special reporting and inspection requirements on the person; or

Impounding some or all of the records or other property associated with the license or permit; or

Limiting the scope of operations under the license or permit; or

If there is clear evidence of a serious threat to the conservation of wildlife resources, suspending the operations of the person under the license or permit; or

Placing other appropriate restrictions, prohibitions, or requirements upon the person.

History.

1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, ss. 8, 98; 1993, c. 539, ss. 856, 857; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1999-456, s. 31; 2003-344, s. 6; 2019-204, s. 6(q).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-204, s. 6(q), effective September 1, 2019, deleted “dealer” following “holding” in subdivision (a)(5).

§ 113-276.3.
Mandatory suspension of entitlement to license or permit for fixed period upon conviction of specified offenses.

Upon conviction of a suspension offense under this section, the defendant’s entitlement to any license or permit applicable to the type of activity he was engaging in that resulted in the conviction is suspended for the period stated in subsection (d). The period of suspension begins:

Upon the surrender to an authorized agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission of all applicable licenses and permits; or

If no licenses or permits are possessed, the defendant fails or refuses to surrender all licenses or permits, or any license or permit is lost or destroyed, upon the Executive Director’s placing in the mail the notification required by subsection (c).

If the defendant does not wish to appeal, the presiding judge may order surrender of all applicable licenses and permits to an agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission. If the presiding judge does not order the surrender, or if there is for any other reason a failure by the defendant to surrender all applicable licenses and permits, an authorized agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission must demand surrender. Each day’s failure or refusal to surrender a license or permit upon demand, in the absence of satisfactorily accounting for the failure to do so, is a separate offense. A charge under this subsection does not affect the power of the court to institute contempt proceedings if a failure or refusal to surrender a license or permit also violates a court order. Any agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission accepting surrender of licenses and permits, in the courtroom or at a subsequent time and place, must transmit them to the Executive Director with a written notation of the date of surrender and a report of other pertinent circumstances required by the Executive Director.

The Executive Director must institute a procedure for the systematic reporting to him by protectors or other authorized agents of the Wildlife Resources Commission of all convictions of suspension offenses under this section. Upon obtaining information concerning conviction of a suspension offense and receiving any surrendered licenses and permits, the Executive Director must determine if all appropriate licenses and permits possessed by the defendant have been surrendered; if not, the Executive Director must notify the appropriate agent of the Wildlife Resources Commission to demand surrender or renew a demand for surrender under the terms of subsection (b) if it is feasible to do so. Upon satisfying himself that he has received all licenses and permits for which surrender may feasibly be obtained, if any, the Executive Director must mail the defendant a notice of the suspension of his entitlement to possess or procure any license or permit of the type applicable to the activity engaged in that resulted in conviction of the suspension offense. The notice must specify the commencement and termination dates of the period of suspension that apply under the terms of this section.

Any violation of this Subchapter or of any rule adopted by the Wildlife Resources Commission under the authority of this Subchapter which is subject to a penalty greater than the one provided in G.S. 113-135(a)(1) is a suspension offense. Conviction of any of the following suspension offenses results in a suspension for a period of two years:

A violation of G.S. 113-294(b).

A violation of G.S. 113-294(c).

(2a)

A violation of G.S. 113-294(c1).

A violation of G.S. 113-294(e).

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-120, s. 2, effective October 1, 1999.

A violation of

G.S. 113-291.1

A.

A third or subsequent violation of G.S. 14-159.6(a).

A conviction of any other suspension offense results in a suspension for a period of one year.

Unless otherwise provided in the judgment, any action by a court under

G.S. 113-277

to suspend entitlement to a license or permit or to suspend or revoke a license or permit supersedes any suspension of entitlement to a license or permit mandated by this section. If the judgment of the court after a conviction for suspension offense does not include any suspension or revocation action, the provisions of this section apply.

History.

1979, c. 830, s. 1; 1981, c. 424, s. 1; 1987, c. 827, s. 98; 1999-120, s. 2; 2005-62, s. 3; 2015-144, s. 4(a).